Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Fees and Costs

23A.200.
Fees and costs for civil cases.

The Supreme Court shall by rule set the filing fees and miscellaneous costs for civil cases filed in the Circuit Court.

The following fee shall be paid directly to the sheriff or other officer serving the process by the party requesting the service, at the time of the request as follows:

Service of process (per process)
. . . . .
$20.00

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 56, effective January 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 30, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 159, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 266, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 445, § 34, effective July 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 134, § 3, effective July 1, 1994; 1996, ch. 248, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

23A.205.
Court costs for criminal cases in Circuit Court — Payment required — Exceptions.

Court costs for a criminal case in the Circuit Court shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

The taxation of court costs against a defendant, upon conviction in a case, shall be mandatory and shall not be subject to probation, suspension, proration, deduction, or other form of nonimposition in the terms of a plea bargain or otherwise, unless the court finds that the defendant is a poor person as defined by KRS 453.190(2) and that he or she is unable to pay court costs and will be unable to pay the court costs in the foreseeable future.

If the court finds that the defendant does not meet the standard articulated in subsection (2) of this section and that the defendant is nonetheless unable to pay the full amount of the court costs, fees, or fines at the time of sentencing, then the court may establish an installment payment plan in accordance with KRS

534.020

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 58, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 321, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 606, § 43, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 183, § 1, effective August 1, 2002; 2017 ch. 158, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

23A.206.
Additional costs imposed in criminal cases — Funds distributed to local governments and counties — Funds used for police, jails, and transport of prisoners.

For the purposes of this section:

“Local government” means a city, county, charter county, urban-county, or consolidated local government; and

“Police department” means a police department created by a local government which employs one (1) or more officers certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

In criminal cases a fee of twenty dollars ($20) shall be added to the costs imposed by KRS

23A.205

that the defendant is required to pay.

The circuit clerk shall pay the funds from fees collected under this section to the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS

23A.215

for distribution as provided in subsection (5) of this section to local governments with police departments or local governments that contract for police services, and to counties with fiscal responsibilities for jails or the transporting of prisoners.

All funds distributed to local governments shall be used for payment of expenses for operation of the local government’s police department or contracted police services. All funds distributed to counties with fiscal responsibilities for jails or the transporting of prisoners shall be used for the payment of costs associated with the housing or transporting of prisoners.

Payments shall be distributed quarterly by the Finance and Administration Cabinet beginning October 1, 2004, as follows:

Thirty percent (30%) of the total shall be distributed equally to all local governments with police departments or that contract for police services;

Fifty percent (50%) of the total shall be distributed to local governments with police departments or local governments that contract for police services on a per capita basis according to the number of certified police officers employed by the police department on July 1 each year or providing services to the local government pursuant to a contract on July 1 of each year. For purposes of this subsection, each local government that contracts for police services shall be considered to employ one (1) police officer for each sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) it expends during each fiscal year for police services under a written contract; and

Twenty percent (20%) of the total shall be distributed equally to counties with fiscal responsibilities for jails or the transporting of prisoners.

On or before August 1 of each year, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall certify to the Finance and Administration Cabinet the number of certified police officers employed by each local government.

On or before August 1 of each year, each local government contracting for police services shall certify to the Finance and Administration Cabinet the amount of money expended for police services under a written contract during the previous fiscal year.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A deemed necessary for the administration of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 78, § 1, effective April 6, 2004; 2007, ch. 85, § 108, effective June 26, 2007.

23A.2065.
Additional fees for criminal cases — Allocation to general fund and telephonic behavioral health jail triage system.

In addition to the twenty dollar ($20) fee created by KRS

23A.206

, in criminal cases a ten dollar ($10) fee shall be added to the costs imposed by KRS

23A.205

that the defendant is required to pay. The first five dollars ($5) of each fee collected under this section shall be placed into the general fund, and the remainder of the fee shall be allocated to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the implementation and operation of a telephonic behavioral health jail triage system as provided in KRS

210.365

and

441.048

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 137, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 97, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 158, § 3, effective July 1, 2008.

23A.207.
Fees for criminal cases.

In criminal cases, the following fees shall be charged by the circuit clerk and paid to the clerk at the time the corresponding services are requested:

Preparing an attestation . . . . . $0.50

Preparing a certification . . . . . $5.00

Preparing a copy of a document (per page) . . . . . $0.25

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 183, § 2, effective August 1, 2002.

23A.208.
Additional fee for sex crime, stalking, or related inchoate offenses.

In addition to fees created by KRS

23A.205

,

23A.206

, and

23A.2065

, an administrative fee of thirty dollars ($30) shall be added to the costs that the defendant is required to pay for the following crimes:

A sex crime, meaning an offense described in:

KRS Chapter 510;

KRS

530.020

;

KRS 530.064(1)(a);

KRS

531.310

; and

KRS

531.320

;

Stalking, meaning conduct prohibited under KRS

508.140

and

508.150

; and

A criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crimes set forth in this subsection.

The first one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each fee collected under this section shall be placed into the general fund, and the remainder of the fee shall be allocated by the clerk of the court on a quarterly basis to the address protection program fund established in KRS

14.260

to be used solely to establish, operate, and maintain the confidential address protection program established in KRS

14.260

.

The court may waive all or any portion of the fee required by this section if the court finds that a person subject to the surcharge is indigent or financially unable to pay all or any portion of the surcharge. The court may waive only the portion of the surcharge that the court finds the person is financially unable to pay.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 101, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

23A.209.
Additional fee for expenses of Kentucky Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force.

In addition to the twenty dollar ($20) fee created by KRS

23A.206

and the ten dollar ($10) fee created by KRS

23A.206

5, a ten dollar ($10) fee shall be added in criminal cases to the costs imposed by KRS

23A.205

. The fee collected under this section shall be allocated to the Department of Kentucky State Police for the training, salaries, and equipment of the Kentucky Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 122, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

23A.210.
Fees for appeals from District Court or transfer of cases to Circuit Court. [Repealed.]

23A.215.
Disposition of Circuit Court fees and costs.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all fees and costs collected pursuant to KRS 23A.200(1) shall be deposited in the general fund of the State Treasury.

Fees consisting of reimbursement for incidental direct outlays, including but not limited to postage and legal advertising, may be retained by the clerk and expended for these purposes in accordance with relevant directives of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Additional costs in Circuit Court civil cases authorized by subsection (2) of KRS

23A.200

shall be paid to the sheriff or other officer serving the process.

Filing fees in civil actions shall be recoverable as costs.

No later than the seventh working day of each month the circuit clerk shall pay the funds collected from each court cost collected under KRS

23A.205

to the court cost distribution fund established in KRS

42.320

and report to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Administrative Office of the Courts the amounts deposited into the court cost distribution fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 62, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 200, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 321, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 134, § 4, effective July 1, 1994; 2002, ch. 183, § 3, effective August 1, 2002.

23A.220.
Assessment by the fiscal court of additional fees and costs.

A fiscal court, by ordinance, may assess additional fees and costs for the purpose of paying expenses for courthouses, bonds related to them, and administration expenses of the Circuit Court as follows:

In civil cases, a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) may be added to filing fees;

In criminal cases, a cost of twenty-five dollars ($25) may be added to the court costs that the defendant is required to pay; and

In civil cases that are appealed from the Circuit Court to the Court of Appeals, a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) may be added to the filing fees.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 54, § 2, effective March 15, 2001.